Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1418
Funds from bond issuance; investment authorized; conditions.

The resolution authorizing the bonds of any issue or the trust agreement securing such bonds may provide that any of such money may be temporarily invested and reinvested pending disbursements of such money in such securities and other investments as shall be provided in such resolution or trust agreement, and shall provide that any bank or trust company with which such money shall be deposited shall act as trustee of such money and shall hold and apply the same for purposes pursuant to this section, subject to such regulation as sections 70-1401 to 70-1423 and such resolution or trust agreement may provide.

Laws 1982, LB 852, § 18.